Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-434
Elections; voting by proxies; when permitted.

At all elections any person living outside the different counties owning or controlling assessed real estate may vote by proxy duly authorized in writing on file with the county clerk.

Laws 1907, c. 153, § 28, p. 484;

R.S.1913, § 1898;

C.S.1922, § 1846;

C.S.1929, § 31-534;

R.S.1943, § 31-434.